test/src/morphology/N-wayasit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - wayasit - ok : # -m animate noun, hoof
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg: wayasit
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl: wayasitak
     wayasit+N+AN+Loc: wayasitihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Sg: wayasitisis
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Pl: wayasitisisak
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Loc: wayasitisisihk

     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwayasit
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwayasit
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg: owayasit
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg: owayasityiw
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwayasitnân
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwayasitnân
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiniskâw
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl: oniskâw
     wayasit+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl: owayasityiw

     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwayasitak
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwayasitak
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg: owayasita
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg: owayasityiwa
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwayasitnânak
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwayasitnawak
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwayasitwâwak
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl: owayasitwâwa
     wayasit+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl: owayasityiwa

     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Sg: niwayasitisis
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwayasitisis
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Sg: owayasitisis
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iSg: owayasitisisiyiw
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Pl: niwayasitisisinân
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwayasitisisinaw
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwayasitisisiwâw
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Pl: owayasitisisiwâw
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iPl: owayasitisisiyiw

     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Sg: niwayasitisisak
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwayasitisisak
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Sg: owayasitisisa
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iSg: owayasitisisiyiwa
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Pl: niwayasitisisinânak
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwayasitisisinawak
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwayasitisisiwâwak
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Pl: owayasitisisiwâwa
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iPl: owayasitisisiyiwa

     wayasit+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: niwayasithk
     wayasit+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwayasithk
     wayasit+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: owayasithk
     wayasit+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: owayasityihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nisinânihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwayasitnâhk
     wayasit+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kisiwâwihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: osiwâwihk 
     wayasit+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: owayasityihk

     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Px1Sg+Loc: niwayasitisisihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwayasitisisihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Px3Sg+Loc: owayasitisisihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Px3iSg+Loc: owayasitssiyihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Px1Pl+Loc: niwayasitisisnânihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwayasitssinâh
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwayasitisiswâwihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Px3Pl+Loc: owayasitisiswâwihk
     wayasit+N+AN+Dim+Px3iPl+Loc: owayasitisisiyihk
